Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.280

Trade barrier matching fund program.

(1) The legislature finds that trade barriers have become an increasingly important issue in the agricultural arena. Further, the world trade organization highlighted the need for "a fair and level playing field." The legislature finds that both large and small commodity groups need adequate resources to address trade barrier issues.

(2) There is created within the department of agriculture a trade barrier matching fund program to assist agriculture [agricultural] industries in fighting trade barriers. The purpose of the program is to allow the department of agriculture and the agricultural industry to combine funds in order to address trade barriers issues impacting the agricultural industry.

[ 2001 c 324 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2001 c 324: See note following RCW 43.23.275.